Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 3. Roads, Ditches and Flumes; Pipe, Electric Transmission, Telephone
and Telegraph Lines

§§ 1-26-301 through 1-26-303.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 3.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

Editor's notes. —

This article derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 34, part I, § 45 and Laws 1901, ch. 31, §§ 1 and 2.